Washington statutes.
RCW 39.106.050

Elements of joint municipal utility services agreements.

A joint municipal utility services agreement that forms and governs an authority must include the elements described in this section, together with such other provisions an authority's members deem appropriate. However, the failure of an agreement to include each and every one of the elements described in this section shall not render the agreement invalid. An agreement must:

(1) Identify the members, together with conditions upon which additional members that are providing utility services may join the authority, the conditions upon which members may or must withdraw, including provisions for handling of relevant assets and liabilities upon a withdrawal, and the effect of boundary adjustments of the authority and boundary adjustments between or among members;

(2) State the name of the authority;

(3) Describe the utility services that the authority will provide;

(4) Specify how the number of directors of the authority's board will be determined, and how those directors will be appointed. Each director on the board of an authority must be an elected official of a member. Except as limited by an agreement, an authority's board may exercise the authority's powers;

(5) Describe how votes of the members represented on the authority's board are to be weighted, and set forth any limitations on the exercise of powers of the authority's board, which may include, by way of example, requirements that certain decisions be made by a supermajority of members represented on an authority's board, based on the number of members and/or some other factor or factors, and that certain decisions be ratified by the legislative authorities of the members;

(6) Describe how the agreement is to be amended;

(7) Describe how the authority's rules may be adopted and amended;

(8) Specify the circumstances under which the authority may be dissolved, and how it may terminate its operations, wind up its affairs, and provide for the handling, assumption, and/or distribution of its assets and liabilities;

(9) List any legally authorized substantive or corporate powers that the authority will not exercise;

(10) Specify under which personnel laws the authority will operate, which may be the personnel laws applicable to any one of its Washington local government members;

(11) Specify under which public works and procurement laws the authority will operate, which may be the public works and procurement laws applicable to any one of its Washington local government members;

(12) Consistent with RCW 39.106.040(3)(b), specify under which Washington eminent domain laws any condemnations by the authority will be subject;

(13) Specify how the treasurer of the authority will be appointed, which may be an officer or employee of the authority, the treasurer or chief finance officer of any Washington local government member, or the treasurer of any Washington county in which any member of the authority is located. However, if the total number of utility customers of all of the members of an authority does not exceed two thousand five hundred, the treasurer of an authority must be either the treasurer of any member or the treasurer of a county in which any member of the authority is located;

(14) Specify under which Washington state statute or statutes surplus property of the authority will be disposed;

(15) Describe how the authority's budgets will be prepared and adopted;

(16) Describe how any assets of members that are transferred to or managed by the authority will be accounted for;

(17) Generally describe the financial obligations of members to the authority;

(18) Describe how rates and charges imposed by the authority, if any, will be determined. An agreement may specify a specific Washington state statute applicable to one or all of its members for the purpose of governing rate-setting criteria applicable to retail customers, if any;

(19) Specify the Washington state statute or statutes under which bonds, notes, and other obligations of the authority will be issued for the purpose of performing or providing utility services, which must be a bond issuance statute applicable to one or more of its members other than a tribal member. If all of its members are the same type of Washington governmental entity, then a Washington state statute or statutes governing the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations issued by that type of entity shall govern;

(20) Specify under which Washington state statute or statutes any liens of an authority shall be exercised, which must be statutes applicable to the type or types of utility service for which the lien shall apply. Further, if all of its members are the same type of Washington governmental entity, then the statute or statutes governing that type of entity shall govern;

(21) Include any other provisions deemed necessary and appropriate by the members.

[ 2011 c 258 s 5.]